Washington statutes.
RCW 19.166.080

Complaints.

The secretary of state may, upon receipt of a complaint regarding an international student exchange organization, report the matter to the organization involved, the United States Information Agency, or the council on standards for international education travel, as he or she deems appropriate.

[ 1991 c 128 s 8.]